Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.086

Execution.

Each record required or permitted by this chapter to be filed in the office of the secretary of state must comply with the requirements of Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW and must be executed in the following manner:

(1) Each original certificate of formation must be executed by the person or persons forming the limited liability company;

(2) A reservation of name may be executed by any person;

(3) A transfer of reservation of name must be executed by, or on behalf of, the applicant for the reserved name;

(4) A registration of name must be executed by any member or manager of the foreign limited liability company;

(5) A certificate of amendment or restatement must be executed by at least one manager, or by a member if management of the limited liability company is reserved to the members;

(6) A certificate of dissolution must be executed by the person or persons authorized to wind up the limited liability company's affairs pursuant to RCW 25.15.297(3);

(7) If a surviving domestic limited liability company is filing articles of merger, the articles of merger must be executed by at least one manager, or by a member if management of the limited liability company is reserved to the members, or if the articles of merger are being filed by a surviving foreign limited liability company, limited partnership, corporation, or other person, the articles of merger must be executed by a person authorized by such foreign limited liability company, limited partnership, corporation, or other person;

(8) A foreign limited liability company's application for registration as a foreign limited liability company doing business within the state must be executed by any member or manager of the foreign limited liability company; and

(9) If a converting limited liability company is filing articles of conversion, the articles of conversion must be executed by at least one manager, or by a member if management of the limited liability company is reserved to the members.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7109; 2015 c 188 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.